Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12.1 Underground Storage Tanks

46-12.1-1.
Purpose and scope of chapter.

For the purposes of promoting health, safety, or general welfare, and in order to effect uniform regulation within the state for regulating underground storage tanks as defined in §

46-12.1-2

, the cities and towns may adopt, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, ordinances providing for the regulation and control of underground storage tanks as defined in §

46-12.1-2

, and establishing procedures for the registration, testing and removal of such underground tanks.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect public health from the contamination of public and private water supplies due to leakage from such facilities, to protect public safety from the dangers of fire and explosion associated with such leakage, and to protect the general welfare by preserving limited water supplies for present and future use.

Ordinances shall be, as far as possible, consistent with state regulations and in no case shall be less stringent than state rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 488, § 1.

46-12.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, all terms shall, where the context permits, be construed in accordance with the “regulations for underground storage facilities used for petroleum products and hazardous materials,” as promulgated by the department of environmental management. The following terms as used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

“Abandoned” means the relinquishment or termination of possession, ownership, or control of underground storage tanks, by vacating or by disposition, or the underground storage tank being out of service for a continuous period in excess of six (6) months.

“Underground” means that ten percent (10%) or more of the volume of facility components storage tanks and piping is buried in the ground.

“Underground storage tank” means either:

On site underground storage tanks used for storing heating oil and serving a one, two (2), or three (3) family dwelling including underground pipes connected thereto; or

Farm or residential underground storage tanks holding less than one thousand one hundred (1,100) gallons and storing motor fuel or heating oil for noncommercial purposes including underground pipes connected thereto.

“Enforcing officer” means the chief of the fire department, the building official, the public safety director, the public utilities director or the public works director of the several cities, towns and fire districts, as may be designated in any ordinance adopted under this chapter, or his or her designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 363, § 1.

46-12.1-3.
Powers and duties of city or town enforcing officer.

The enforcing officer shall be responsible for administering local ordinances adopted pursuant to this chapter. In addition to any other powers granted the enforcing officer by ordinance or other state law, the officer shall have the authority to:

Issue permits for the maintenance, installation, abandonment, and removal of underground storage tanks;

Require the removal, at the owner’s expense, of all tanks and underground pipes deemed to pose a threat to the public health or the environment;

Require testing, monitoring, record keeping, and reporting by the owner or operator, and record keeping and reporting by suppliers;

Inspect facilities at which underground storage tanks are located;

Require closure of abandoned storage tanks consistent with the permanent closure procedures in the regulations for underground storage facilities used for petroleum products and hazardous materials issued by the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 363, § 1.

46-12.1-4.
Penalties.

Violations of the provisions of §

46-12.1-3

shall be subject to fines of fifty ($50.00) dollars per day for each day the tank remains in the ground after notification, in writing, by the enforcing officer that the provisions of §

46-12.1-3

have been violated. This penalty shall be in addition to any fine or penalty that may be assessed under other state law or regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 115.